www/common/latex/texlive/texmf-dist/tex/generic/hyph-utf8/patterns/txt/hyph-id.pat.txt
a1
e1
i1
o1
u1
2b1d
2b1j
2b1k
2b1n
2b1s
2b1t
2c1k
2c1n
2d1k
2d1n
2d1p
2f1d
2f1k
2f1n
2f1t
2g1g
2g1k
2g1n
2h1k
2h1l
2h1m
2h1n
2h1w
2j1k
2j1n
2k1b
2k1k
2k1m
2k1n
2k1r
2k1s
2k1t
2l1b
2l1f
2l1g
2l1h
2l1k
2l1m
2l1n
2l1s
2l1t
2l1q
2m1b
2m1k
2m1l
2m1m
2m1n
2m1p
2m1r
2m1s
2n1c
2n1d
2n1f
2n1j
2n1k
2n1n
2n1p
2n1s
2n1t
2n1v
2p1k
2p1n
2p1p
2p1r
2p1t
2r1b
2r1c
2r1f
2r1g
2r1h
2r1j
2r1k
2r1l
2r1m
2r1n
2r1p
2r1r
2r1s
2r1t
2r1w
2r1y
2s1b
2s1k
2s1l
2s1m
2s1n
2s1p
2s1r
2s1s
2s1t
2s1w
2t1k
2t1l
2t1n
2t1t
2w1t
2ng1g
2ng1h
2ng1k
2ng1n
2ng1s
2n3s2t
.be2r3
.te2r3
.me2ng3
.pe2r3
2ng.
2ny.
i2o1n
a2ir
1ba1ga2i
2b1an.
2c1an.
2d1an.
2f1an.
2g1an.
2h1an.
2j1an.
2k1an.
2l1an.
2m1an.
2ng1an.
2n1an.
2p1an.
2r1an.
2s1an.
2t1an.
2v1an.
2z1an.
3an.
.a2ta2u
.ta3ng4an.
.le3ng4an.
.ja3ng4an.
.ma3ng4an.
.pa3ng4an.
.ri3ng4an.
.de3ng4an.
